Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,138
Dissolved corporation; trustees; bond, action upon.

Suit may be brought on such bond by any person injured by the negligence or wrongful act of the trustees in the discharge of their duties.

R.S.1867, Code § 721, p. 519;

R.S.1913, § 8345;

C.S.1922, § 9297;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,129;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,138.